_	He dispatches five mysterious individuals with the promise that the one who brings it to him will get all he possesses.
_	Dutton agreed to take the presidency on the promise that the league would reinstate the Americans following the war.
_	Treadwell signed Americans For Tax Reform's Taxpayer Protection Pledge and ran on the promise that he will never vote to increase taxes on individuals or businesses.
_	All of its Christian inhabitants were forced to flee to Lebanon or the Israeli village of Rameh, after they were expelled by Jewish forces in 1948, and, despite the promise that they would be returned in two weeks' time, the villagers were never allowed to return.
_	They tried to win Bo Swe over to their side with the promise that he would be appointed Extra Assistant Commissioner 5th Grade at Ngape should he give himself up with his men and capture U Ottama.
_	Some time later, and when Mitsuko was nine years old, she then met her stepfather who ended up giving her a doll which was the only time he'd ever really shown her kindness along with the promise that they would be a family.
_	Mrs Tyrold allowed Eugenia to join the festivities only on the promise that the party of young people would not leave the grounds of Cleves because the girl had not yet been inoculated against smallpox.
_	When that failed, Chester attempted to lure the Hamiltons to his plantation with the promise that they would be treated as freedmen and reunited with their children.
_	The lack of uptake among the majority of modern gamers has also made joysticks a sort of an anachronism, though some new controller designs and simplification of controls offer the promise that space sims may be playable in their full capacity on gaming consoles at some time in the future.
_	When a good-hearted detective, Kelcey, lets them off the hook with the promise that they will go straight, they agree.
_	The show centres around a spoof investigation of Del Boy by the BBC Breakfast show, "Breakfast Time", over allegations that he sold white mice to a customer with the promise that they would turn into horses at midnight.
_	It sees the BBC's consumer expert, Lynn Faulds Wood (playing herself) attempting to quiz Del for misleading Mr Buttons, described by Del as a "wally in a funny hat", about some mice he had sold him with the promise that they would turn into horses.
_	In 2011, the European Commission issued a request for reports on the current use of insects as food, with the promise that reports from each European Union member state would serve to inform legislative proposals for the new process for insect foods.
_	He then detailed the political changes which had been taking place in Malaya and explained that his election victory was based on the promise that "colonialism must end and that this country must be given freedom."
_	Once Andriamasinavalona's sons had been installed in their territories, Andriantomponimerina tested his authority by imposing a particular hairstyle upon the Marovatana people he ruled, in disregard of the promise that the king had made to respect the diverse customs and taboos of Imerina.
_	By 1202 a compromise was found: the parties agreed on reciprocal defense within the borders of the diocese of “Luni” as well as the equal division of the contended lands, under the promise that the bishop would pay an initial amount of money plus a yearly tax.
_	Brian asks Faye to give the school another chance on the promise that Lindsay will be closely watched, which she does.
_	The siblings recorded the album with the promise that each member got a song to sing by themselves.
_	In return, the Iraqi government demanded, and received, additional payments and loans, as well as the promise that IPC would complete two oil pipelines to the Mediterranean by 1935—something CFP had demanded for a long time, in order to get its share of the oil quickly to France.
_	To keep the conquistadores away, he sent a delegation of his people with emeralds, gold and mantles to offer the Spanish with the promise that Tundama would surrender bringing eight more of these.
_	Their leader/progenitor was one Undetharaya who whilst fleeing the said Muslim ruler, was unable to cross an overflowing river( Some legends claim the river to be Godavari and some as Ganges) and was helped by a Kuruba called "Jaladhi Bapparaya" on the promise that the community would be named after him.
_	She uses the hoard, and the promise that she would return to the church and found a nunnery dedicated to helping the poor and sick of Wessex, to convince Alfred to mount an attempt to rescue Uhtred.
_	Kathir did the deed on the promise that his status within the councillor's gang will be elevated once he is released, but the promise was reneged.
_	In "Phantom Blood", the child of an abusive drunkard named Dario Brando, Dio Brando becomes the adopted brother of Jonathan Joestar by using the promise that George Joestar made to Dario years ago.
_	Nolan Bushnell eventually turned to Warner Communications, and sold the company to them in 1976 for US$28 million on the promise that Stella would be produced as soon as possible.
_	After ninety minutes of violence, the remaining live prisoners, most of whom were in hiding, were ordered to come out on the promise that they would not be shot.
_	In 1423, her sons submitted a complaint that their mother had been assaulted by the royal soldiers despite the promise that she was to be left out of the conflict: her carriage had been attacked and her male staff had been mugged and captured.
_	Following the change in control of the Council, Cllr Andy Sutton took over with the promise that every aspect of the Conservative manifesto would be followed as they had indicated before the election.
_	This showed the promise that was to come the next year.
_	Nelly agrees to leave with the trouble-maker, but with the promise that Sonny will soon join them.
_	The title of duc de Castries was conferred by brevet in 1784, with the promise that the title duc de Guines would revert to them, to Armand Charles Augustin de La Croix de Castries.
_	One woman who got pregnant in her 40s was told she "was not ready" to be a parent, and was pressured to get an abortion with the promise that she had time to get pregnant again.
_	The series returned to TV Land in February 2009 with members of the Class of 1988 of Chandler High School in Chandler, Arizona reuniting and the promise that one of them would reveal a major secret.
_	An alternative version of events written in the east of England by monks in contact with Llywelyn's exiled daughter, Gwenllian ferch Llywelyn, and niece, Gwladys ferch Dafydd, states that Llywelyn, at the front of his army, approached the combined forces of Edmund and Roger Mortimer, Hugo Le Strange and Gruffudd ap Gwenwynwyn on the promise that he would receive their homage.
_	The offer was accepted and advanced by the promise that aid would be made permanent if a sum to ensure the continuance of the support could be obtained.
_	This is followed in the Declaration by the promise that “[Hong Kong] will remain unchanged for 50 years”, until 2047.
_	It also sold a $20 million interest in Paul Verhoeven's Showgirls (1995), and aggressively marketed "Cutthroat Island" to overseas distributors, who were convinced to buy the distribution rights in their various countries with the promise that the film was a sure-fire hit.
_	Anne, a young girl who appears to live by herself, convinces her house to talk her things into coming back on the promise that she take better care of them.
_	Nick, seeing that Laura had returned to her beginnings, comforts her with the promise that Madison will return when he gets "cool under the collar."
_	On 23 October the people gathered about the proscribed bishop to protest against the emperor's decree; but Athanasius urged them to submit, consoling them with the promise that his absence would be of short duration.
_	The spirit of the Magna Carta, as well as some specific language within it, was the promise that justice in England to all citizens and their property would be in the common law courts, and nowhere else.
_	Privately, however, Gage sent a special commission to Washington, consisting of Southern Pacific, newspaper and shipping lawyers to negotiate a settlement with the Marine Hospital Service, whereby the federal government would remove Kinyoun from San Francisco with the promise that the state would secretly cooperate with the Marine Hospital Service in stamping out the plague outbreak.
_	Bishop simon was seized and brought before the shah and was offered gifts to make a token obeisance to the sun, and when he refused, they cunningly tempted him with the promise that if he alone would apostatize his people would not be harmed, but that if he refused he would be condemning not just the church leaders but all Christians to destruction.
_	While campaigning he made the promise that if he gets elected governor that "every Californian will have a green lawn and take long showers."
_	Kern's mother died in 1919 and on her deathbed told her son about the promise that she had made back in 1897.
_	He begs Camilla to take the child and raise it, with the promise that he pay for all the costs of the baby.
_	According to this view, Saul is only a "weak branch" (Gen. Rashi 25:3), owing his kingship not to his own merits, but rather to his grandfather, who had been accustomed to light the streets for those who went to the "bet ha-midrash", and had received as his reward the promise that one of his grandsons should sit upon the throne (Lev. Rashi 9:2).
_	Part of the reason he went back to Disney was the promise that he would be able to direct cartoons in color, which he had been unable to do previously.
_	Matias says he'll get the money and laptop back on the promise that Amaya is safe and that Erica is returned as well.
_	After meeting Mirea and telling her how he does not want to give up on his dream, he is kidnapped by the evil organization Jackal and works for them as the anti-hero Ratman with the promise that he could one day graduate to being a full-fledged hero.
_	She guides Patroklos to destroy Soul Edge using Soul Calibur with the promise that she will help him find his sister Pyrrha, though she already knows that Pyrrha is a malfested and must be vanquished.
_	Indeed, the two sisters (the Hag and Magdalene) were forced to serve their sister as ectoplasms, although they were granted the promise that as soon as their assistance was no longer required in her ploys, she would instantly dismiss them to find death and eternal rest.
_	In his third year in the league, Akwari began to show much more of the promise that he had as a youth national teamer - he took possession of the starting right back position midseason, and remained there for the rest of the year, ending the season with 16 starts as the Crew won the MLS Supporters' Shield.
_	M. L. Holbrook gave the town $2,000 ($ adjusted for inflation) and W. M. Killingsworth contributed $1,000 ($ adjusted for inflation) to the project with the promise that it would be returned in due time.
_	An RTOS makes the promise that no more than a specified maximum amount of time will pass between executions of subroutines.
_	On their return, however, one of the three transport ships was captured by a French privateer, the "Grand Decidée", with the men paroled and allowed to return to England on the promise that they would not serve until exchanged for French prisoners.
_	It also ordered military commanders to begin armistice negotiations with the insurgents with the promise that they could participate in the restored representative government.
_	She agrees with the promise that he should come back to her by full moon day for which he agrees.
_	To keep the conquistadores away, he sent a delegation of his people with emeralds, gold and mantles to offer the Spanish with the promise that Tundama would surrender bringing eight more of these.
_	The rainbow, adopted from the Biblical story of the Flood, symbolizes the promise that is offered to man.
_	Kyūki used her heartbreak to possess her with the promise that if she helped him, he would curse her beloved’s wife and force him to leave her and return to Keiko.
_	The producer watches the tape can not believe the incident and dismisses Guillermo from filming with the promise that he will never get a contract for any other production.
_	The Jews received the Portuguese knights, their former countrymen, into their houses very hospitably and let many of them go free on the promise that they would send back their ransom from Portugal.
_	Listening to this, Seeta is all happy and after making the promise that if in future she seeks his favours, he would confront Raji, rather than sympathising her.
_	However, she becomes trapped in the castle, eventually freed by the historian Camas Erl on the promise that she will bring him to meet Faey, who has been alive for ages, and whose history is entwined with the city's.
_	Four handsome boys, Kyouhei, Takenaga, Yuki and Ranmaru must try to turn her into a lady to please her aunt, who is also their landlady, with the promise that they won't have to pay the rent if they succeed.
_	Gamezebo wrote " Despite its lack of realism, fans of flight will want to sample it-as will anyone else who's just in the mood for a whimsical iOS game. " 148Apps said " Air Mail definitely lives up to the promise that the game had when I first got to play it.
_	Although the judge originally demanded a bond equivalent to $54,000, they were released without bail on the promise that they would return for a later court appearance.
_	Prince encouraged Chavez to write 21 poems with the promise that they would make a poetry album together.
_	In return of their submission, the Masovian Dukes received the promise that if the King died without sons, the entire inheritance of Bolesław III passed to them.
_	In order to entice them to visit doctors during pregnancy, he instituted a program of ultrasounds with the promise that the women could see their unborn baby.
_	At the end of the campaign, some families were able to reconcile with the Swabian League and their estates were restored in return for a sum of gold and the promise that they would respect the peace.
_	In 1990, the International Olympic Committee and Juan Antonio Samaranch were looking for ways to increase the number of events in the Winter Olympics for women, and made the suggestion to IIHF president Günther Sabetzki, with the promise that if it was successful, Samaranch would fast-track the sport into the Olympics.
_	After 9 months, however, necessity forced employees to return to work with their demands unmet, though they returned with the promise that the state legislature—controlled by Democrats for the first time since 1914—would consider enacting a 48-hour law.
_	Governor Bennett remarked that "[In 1974] we campaigned on the promise that we were going to operate the government on a very efficient and economical basis - that we were not going to rely on patronage.
_	This event puts the two of them into the ultimate test of commitment, love, and the promise that binds them together.
_	The dragon replaces Einon's wounded heart with half of its own on the promise that Einon will rule with justice and virtue.
_	Records, and convinced Peaches to sell its inaugural 45—according to Smear, on the promise that it would be the "only store in the world" to offer it.
_	He uses his body to help him in his plan with the promise that he could still get the Priestess all for himself.
_	Through personal conversations with the composer, Klein reported that Spence was convinced to sign a contract that relinquished all of the rights to his music to NFL Films under the promise that the enterprise would return the document to the composer.
_	There is an emphasis on the thoughts and attitudes of the heart as well as the promise that the pure in heart will both see God and be like him.
_	In this custom, the bride's father gives his dear daughter's hand to the groom with the promise that going forward bridegroom will take care of her.
_	The two generals recruited about 50,000 men: mostly Freikorps, Baltic Germans, as well as some Russian POWs captured by Germany in World War I and then released on the promise that they would help fight against the Bolsheviks in the Russian Civil War.
_	When LACMA was offered a collection of works by Honoré Daumier, Hammer bought the works on the promise that he would give them to the museum.
_	An old woman came to her, got the story from her, and on the promise that the girl would call her "Aunt" on her wedding day, did the spinning for her.
_	The unfunded investors—TCW and GSC Partners (asset management firms that managed both hedge funds and CDOs)—did not put up any money up front; they received annual premiums from Goldman via the CDO in return for the promise that they would pay the CDO if the reference securities failed and the CDO did not have enough funds to pay the short investors.
_	Timeshare owners also face a myriad of unscrupulous timeshare listing companies looking for large up-front fees with the promise that their timeshare will soon be out of their name.
_	But Weldon did return with direct communication between the Iraqi Prime Minister to Secretary of State Hillary Clinton and the promise that four detained journalists would be freed.
_	Although showing himself to be a solidly average starting pitcher, he would continue to struggle with his control, annually putting up dismal strikeouts-to-walk ratios, and failing to show the promise that made him a first round selection.
_	He had a penchant for drumming on various objects around the house with a pair of chopsticks, so for his thirteenth birthday his parents bought him a pair of drum sticks, a practice drum and some lessons, with the promise that if he stuck with it for a year they would buy him a kit.
_	With the promise that Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong made in August 2004, allowing indoor talks to proceed ahead without a license from the police, it was an ideal time to organize talks, workshops, and related events as part of the line-up for IndigNation.
_	The public were asked to cooperate with police throughout this undertaking, with the promise that all records obtained would not be compared for usage in other cases, and that these records would be destroyed at the completion of this task.
_	Despite the queen's insistence that Entreri and Jarlaxle be executed for treason, they are permitted, along with Athrogate, to leave the city with his life with the promise that they will never again enter the kingdom.
_	Virarajendra immediately nominated Vikramaditya-VI as the heir to the Chalukya throne and also gave his daughter in marriage to him on extracting the promise that his daughter's son will succeed Vikramaditya-VI as the next Chalukya King.[++]
_	An old woman is trying to bring too many things out of her apartment, so Charles sends her back inside with the promise that she can come with them next time.
_	Oral tradition suggests that when they settled in the Rustenburg valley, it captured heavy overnight dew, holding the promise that the land would be fertile and hence that the community would prosper.
_	Signaling in a four star review by Jesus Freak Hideout, Alex Caldwell pronounces, "While "Giving Over" doesn't synthesize all of the Ward brother's influences seamlessly (it usually takes a few albums to take all those sounds and make something that is your own), the album has the raw ingredients of a great debut album, and the promise that Consumed By Fire has good things in store down the road a piece."
_	The journey takes her to a village in Punjab in the search of a Bibi Saroop (Sadhana Singh), whose voice holds the promise that Vibs is searching for.
_	Mr. A. Hosie, the British Consul at Chengdu, made a quick trip from Batang to the Tibetan border escorted by Chinese authorities, in September 1904, on the promise that he would not even put a foot over the border into Tibet.
_	The Pals battalions of World War I were specially constituted battalions of the British Army comprising men who had enlisted together in local recruiting drives, with the promise that they would be able to serve alongside their friends, neighbours and colleagues ("pals"), rather than being arbitrarily allocated to battalions.
_	Stern signed a plea deal for 25 years in prison, on the promise that he would be able to appeal.
_	Palpatine manipulates the young Jedi into becoming his Sith apprentice, Darth Vader, with the promise that the dark side holds the power to save Padmé from dying in childbirth.
_	In that time Forrester invented systems dynamics, which "held out the promise that the behavior of whole systems could be represented and understood through modeling the dynamical feedback process going on within them".
_	If any mare owners fancy taking a chance with him we'll be happy to talk to them, with the promise that if their mare is not tested in foal, we'll offer them a very good deal on one of our other stallions, either Bollin Eric or Monsieur Bond."
_	Nimoy had not intended to join the cast of "", but was enticed back with the promise that his character would be given a dramatic death scene.
_	With this revelation, and the promise that Eric will guide their ships through the fog (thus making a surprise attack possible), Einar is finally able to persuade the other Vikings to mount an invasion of Northumbria.
_	The expedition, moreover, obtained the support of the powerful great landowners of southern Italy in exchange for the promise that their properties be left intact in the upcoming political settlement.
_	Most versions of the song have the singer riding a train fleeing trouble, regretting not seeing his old love and contemplating his future death, with the promise that he will meet his friends or lover again on the beautiful or golden shore.
_	In response, Kraft invited the youth to accompany him to his apartment on the promise that Fancher could live with him.
_	DiBiase was eventually convinced by WWF to sign up despite the fact that he would not be told his gimmick until after he agreed, under the promise that it was something that would receive a serious push.
_	The Marquis de Lafayette, who was a strong power in France at the time and a supposed "friend" of d'Orléans, suggested to him to go to the British Isles with the promise that he could potentially become the head of state of Brabant.
_	This revolt was caused by losing Soliman and Lakandula's kingdom when they were defeated by Miguel Lopez de Legazpi to accept the Spanish sovereignty on the promise that they would be well-treated by the Spaniards and would still retain some of their royal and political powers.
_	Lord come to Dakor to fulfill the promise that he will come to Dakor with Bodana.
_	Julie Barenson’s young husband left her two unexpected gifts before he died – a puppy named Singer and the promise that he would always be watching over her.
_	Laura reconciles with Ian on the promise that they will have a baby, but he has a secret vasectomy.
_	Frogger searches the catacombs for her at the request of Count Blah, with the promise that she may be the princess he is looking for.
_	Local 1195 immediately attempted to make good on the promise that collective bargaining might improve conditions and wages for police officers.
_	Documents filed with the court by the Australian Securities and Investments Commission showed that investors, mostly from Sydney's Assyrian community, were induced to put between $50,000 and $150,000 into the trolley business on the promise that they would receive fortnightly returns of between $4000 and $25,000.
_	After redevelopment, H15 Concern Groups challenged the promise that making wedding as renewal theme as chain stores and famous brand dominated the new street.
_	In return, citizens received immediate rewards (like feasts), as well as the promise that their ayllus would be provided protection from enemies and food if, for example, their harvests failed.
_	Gary K. Wolfe writes in his "Locus" review that Rajaniemi has "spectacularly delivered on the promise that this is likely the most important debut SF novel we'll see this year".
_	He bowed out of the race with the promise that he would be nominated for Governor of New Jersey later that same year.
_	During the 2015 federal election, Justin Trudeau and the Liberal Party of Canada campaigned on the promise that it would be the last federal election under the first-past-the-post electoral system.
_	Dewey did not oppose Roosevelt's New Deal programs altogether, but merely campaigned on the promise that Republicans would run them more efficiently and less corruptly.
_	At the end of the season, in early February 1943, in spite of his having abandoned the Royals, Montreal scout Gus Ogilvie was sent to induce Kennedy to sign a contract with the promise that if he signed, he would finish the season with the Canadiens in the NHL.
_	Buthelezi was convinced to give up the boycott of the elections, after Mandela offered the Zulu king, Goodwill Zwelithini kaBhekuzulu, a guarantee of special status of the Zulu monarchy, and to Buthelezi, the promise that foreign mediators would examine Inkatha's claims to more autonomy in the Zulu area.
_	The nobles resisted until the King, who wanted to avoid a major conflict, requested that they lay down their weapons with the promise that their weapons will be returned the next day.
_	This did not eventuate, and Singh pursued legal action against the FLP leader, Mahendra Chaudhry, for reneging on the promise that he was alleged to have made.
_	Muhammad Ismail was given the title Itikad Khan and sent along with the naval commander Siddi Qasim Yaqut Khan besieged Raigarh in March 1689 till 19 October 1689 when Yesubai and her minister Ramchandra Bavdekar "Pant Amatya" surrendered on the promise that Itikad Khan swear on the Quran that he would protect her and Shahu II against any cruelty.
_	York willingly sacrifices personal glory for the sake of his heirs, electing not to become King himself with the promise that his sons and grandsons will be kings instead.
_	They both applied for admission to Harvard Medical School in 1850, on the sponsorship of the Society and under the promise that they would emigrate to Liberia after earning their degrees.
_	Jasper was introduced as an assistant to The Director (Peter Kotsiopulos) whom Red sought out to join his cause with the promise that he would lead the Cabal himself.
_	It was first shown to the public at MacWorld Expo in January 1987 with the promise that it would be released later that year.
_	Johnson fought Alexander Gustafsson on January 24, 2015 at UFC on Fox 14 with the promise that the winner would earn a title shot against Jon Jones.
_	Ker readmitted Govan into the army, on the promise that he would fight for him.
_	Another Guardian-only game called "ArchKnight" was made, though it was replaced by "DragonFable" before the game could be sufficiently developed, with the promise that "ArchKnight" would be worked into the new game.
_	Formstone’s popularity came from the promise that it was inexpensive, maintenance-free, and more energy-efficient.
_	Rachel leaves town, with the promise that the house that she rented is kept empty so that Angus's spirit can finally rest.
_	Shortly after, they agreed to £50 to Wallace-Johnson, with the promise that the rest would be paid once he arrived in England.
_	The elimination of the fare was just a small part of a sales tax increase that was approved by two-thirds of Miami-Dade voters under the promise that major rail-based transit extensions would take place.
_	Geert was the first to show the promise that dynamic systems theory holds for the understanding of cognitive development.
_	In December 1916 Robert Nivelle had been appointed supreme French commander on the promise that his tactical innovation of the "rolling barrage" would ensure a quick collapse of the German front.
_	The contract that ceded the left bank of the Rhine was in a secret article, along with the promise that it would indemnify the right bank if the left bank of the Rhine should be covered in a final general peace in France.
_	According to the indictment, he met two intelligence officers from China’s Ministry of State Security in Shenzhen, a city bordering Hong Kong, in April 2010, and they gave him “a gift of $100,000 cash in exchange for his cooperation”, with the promise that “they would take care of him for life”.
_	Religious leaders swore loyalty as well, after securing the promise that the Catholic religion would be respected.
_	Desperate to elude its own corrosive dread, it keeps moving, asking, looking, and making the promise that hope isn't just another spiritual cul-de-sac."
_	Beth tries to convince Brad that she would be leaving with or without the promise that she and David would be together.
_	The wraith takes the deal in exchange for the promise that humans will never disturb the wraiths again.
_	However, Clay did not follow, as Watkins secured his son temporary employment in a Richmond emporium, with the promise that Clay would receive the next available clerkship at the Virginia Court of Chancery.
_	On January 9, 2006, ZUN added an empty level called after Level Ex with the version 1.01a patch, with the promise that he would add playable stages in it at a later time.
_	Unlike "Society" actors, "Slayers" participants are not paid; instead, they volunteer in exchange for the promise that any Slayer who survives 30 matches will earn his freedom (though no one ever has).
_	He changed his mind, however, when he was offered a permanent commission with full pay and the promise that the air force would send him to school.
_	Jethro Crouch is willing to will away his son’s inheritance to Sly on the promise that he receives Sly’s money after Sly has died; Abner Truckle solicits his wife to Sly under the impression that it will sway Sly to name him as his heir; Lawyer Craven defends the dignity of Sly in court after the Captain discovers him molesting Mrs. Truckle, for the same promise of riches; Merrilee Fancy, the most popular harlot in the bay town, finds herself in the family way and hopes to marry Sly for his wealth.
_	In jail, Sneha gives birth to a son, whom she gives up for adoption to the jail's matron, Sushila, with the promise that it should not be revealed to him who his real parents are.
_	In 2016 however, the event was cancelled with the promise that it would return "bigger and better".
_	In the summer of 1987, "ECD" found itself repeatedly rejected for an Ice hockey Bundesliga license and when it was eventually granted, two weeks before the start of the season, it was only because the other nine clubs had pushed the German Ice Hockey Federation, the "DEB", to grant it under the promise that they would not demand compensation if the club did fold during the season.
_	Worse, De Weert released the Portuguese crews who had surrendered to the Dutch on the promise that their lives would be spared.
_	This guarantee was included in a Decision by the European Council, with the promise that it would be incorporated into the treaties during their next revision.
_	This included a plan in which some senior Japanese prisoners were released under the promise that they would round up other hidden forces and order them to surrender.
_	Christopher Thelen from The Daily Vault wrote that "All in all, this disc held out the promise that Yankovic was destined for greatness ..."
_	Finally she consented to the forfeiture upon the promise that Ulfeldt would be set free.
_	In chapters 14-18 Levi cites a "book of Enoch", describing the sins of his descendants, with the promise that at the end there will be a glorious priest who will restore the righteousness of his office.
_	Offers were made to enlisted men with no flying experience at all, with the promise that they would graduate as staff sergeants.
_	The story was similar in the second innings – Smith's 56 held together an otherwise flaky top order, which slumped to 99/6 before Chris Lewis took the attack back to the bowlers, finally delivering on the promise that many had seen for years.
_	In 1895, the New York Shakespeare Society purchased the Cottage for use as a headquarters with the promise that it would be maintained in the condition in which Poe used it.
_	Unable to afford rehab, she begs a loan from a local crime boss with the promise that she will work for him to repay her debt once she's clean.
_	Brazzell had signed with the Ti-cats on the promise that he would only play the wide receiver position, but the Ti-cats coaching staff had Brazzell play slotback for them.
_	The vet doesn't hold out much hope, but Toni incites him to survive, with the promise that she will be his best friend forever, and that she will always take care of him.
_	After the Tizen project was announced, the revival of the Mer project was announced on the MeeGo mailing list, with the promise that it would be developed and governed completely in the open as a meritocracy, unlike MeeGo and Tizen.
_	The Huntress considers killing him with her crossbow, but ultimately leaves him bound and gagged in an alley with the promise that she would exact her vengeance on him later.
_	He then taunts Hartigan with the promise that Nancy will suffer the same fate.
_	The protracted negotiations resulted in the payment of the arrears in the Byzantine tribute, the promise that Constantine VII would marry one of Simeon's daughters, and, most importantly, Simeon's official recognition as Emperor (tzar) of the Bulgarians by Patriarch Nicholas in the Blachernai Palace.
_	The maid insists she leave with the promise that she would hand the letter to Eduardo but this letter was never given to Eduardo.
_	However, operational experience in the Soviet-Finnish War showed that this was not what the Soviet Air Force needed, and Lavrentiy Beria, head of the NKVD and of the "sharashka" told that the fighter was to be redesigned as a dive bomber, with the promise that he and his colleagues would be released on its successful completion.
_	The French column surrenderd on the promise that the officers would not be stripped, but they all remained as prisoners of war and surrendered their weapons and money to the Catalans.
_	Most children admit that they have not always been nice, so the "Weihnachtsmann" wants the promise that they do better next year before giving all their presents.
_	Traditionally, Rangers, founded in 1872, attracted the Protestant, Scottish establishment: Celtic, founded later in 1887, represented the Catholic Irish people in Scotland, as Celtic were founded on the promise that the club would deliver much-needed money and resources to a poverty-stricken Catholic population in East Glasgow.
_	Whether or not Mayo seriously considered the offer is unknown, but he was able to use it as leverage to persuade Commerce to give the college $30,000 over the next three years for the promise that it would remain, money that was mostly used to renovate and expand ETNC's physical plant.
_	Later, Nita is arrested and put in prison, though she still gives information to Tris about the room containing the memory serum with the promise that she would be freed.
_	Gaveston was a close friend of Edward II but he had many enemies among the major barons, and had surrendered to them on the promise that he would be unharmed.
_	However, the idea was scrapped on the promise that Kumi would lose enough weight by the time of her next single, "So Into You."
_	With the promise that she will be released, Alex uses her government connections to uncover evidence of Hesser killing an undercover federal informant.
_	In 1862, he was asked to return to the rabbinate of Nidche Israel, with the promise that it would remain strictly Orthodox.
_	The Cat leaves, with the promise that he and the Little Cats, to A through Z, will return someday.
_	Daufer was returned with the promise that his choice of a monastic vocation would be respected.
_	After she had spent seven years at Metro, Famous Players-Lasky was able to lure her away with the promise that she could continue to write for her protégé Valentino.
_	Mary in answer took her black belt/sash and gave it to Monica with the promise that whoever wore this belt would receive her special consolation and protection.
_	He was called up to the majors that August, and seemed to finally display the promise that made him the first overall pick in two drafts.
_	The agent leaves with the promise that if Frank fails to produce the empty containers in two days, the DEA will place him under arrest.
_	When John Nathan-Turner took over as producer of the series for season 18 in 1980, he tempted Leeson back, with the promise that the character would be 'killed off' that year.
_	Barry further added: "The album shines with potential and the promise that a more unique followup waits further down the trail."
_	"Brilliantly balanc[ing] cultural and political history: ["Ecstatic Nation"] is a riveting account of the sectional conflict that preceded the Civil War, and it astutely chronicles the complex aftermath of that war, Reconstruction, including the promise that women would share in a new definition of American citizenship."
_	Like many hymns, too, this one is a tissue of Biblical quotations, including "Alpha and Omega" (st. 2) as an epithet of Christ, from Revelation 21:6; the casting of crowns before God's throne (st. 4), from Revelation 4:10; the promise that Christians shall be "changed from glory into glory" (st. 2 and 4), from 2 Corinthians 3:18; as well as other, more general allusions.
_	Outraged at first, he controls himself and tempts Yousaf with the promise that he can make the problem go away.
_	Alessandra Stanley of "The New York Times" opined, "Those cues also hold out the promise that the coming season will once again pivot the story on the workplace.
_	Peggy struggles to assure Lisa that Phil will not harm Louise and leaves her with Lisa on the promise that Phil can visit regularly.
_	The Troubletones lose the Sectionals competition to New Directions, and Mercedes and the others rejoin New Directions with the promise that the Troubletones will be given one performance number per competition.
_	They obtained the promise that the nation would not be removed across the Mississippi River, unless they somehow "misbehaved."
_	After a raid to clear out migrants goes wrong, the natives decide to try to work together with the new migrants and put them to work clearing the land for Halo London, a city surrounding London-proper, with the promise that they will be given 40 meters and a pipe i.e. a small plot of land and access to utilities.
_	He stated that the next president should make the promise that the United States will "never again torture a prisoner."
_	The Gods, terrified with her intensity, mollified her into returning to Vaikuntam with the promise that the site of her penance would bear Goddess Padmavathi ("Alamelu Manga Devi") as a reincarnation of Goddess Lakshmi during the rule of Akasa Raja.
_	III sent three envoys, the high civilian officers Gennadius Avienus and Trigetius, as well as the Bishop of Rome Leo I, who met Attila at Mincio in the vicinity of Mantua and obtained from him the promise that he would withdraw from Italy and negotiate peace with the Emperor.
_	As Mary was Roman Catholic and Jim Church of England — who later turned agnostic—their children were baptised Roman Catholic but raised non-denominationally, although Mary had married Jim on the promise that any children would be baptised in the Catholic faith.
_	The Tenth and Eleventh Doctors explained that Hurt's regeneration was not The Doctor because his actions during the Time War were a betrayal of the promise that name symbolized.
_	On 7 October 1944, he invited Eady back to his flat with the promise that he had concocted a "special mixture" that could cure her bronchitis.
_	When an empire becomes a vassal, it loses the ability to declare war and make peace independently, and may be called upon to pay "tribute" in the form of game resources to its "master" (suzerain) state in return for the promise that its master will protect the vassal.
_	The Kickstarter page was updated with the promise that additional funds would go to increased production values for the game and film, and deployment on additional platforms.
_	The French commander in Quebec, Louis-Joseph de Montcalm, had orders to try to hold out until the winter spell, with the promise that major reinforcements would arrive from Europe the following year.
_	This concentration of power in the Nixon and Ford White House (whose last chief of staff was Dick Cheney) led presidential candidate Jimmy Carter to campaign in 1976 with the promise that he would not appoint a chief of staff.
_	Buyers, most of whom were unemployed factory workers or peasants, were instructed to feed the ants sugar water, egg yolk and cake, with the promise that after three months, they could sell them back to the company.
_	"The Express Tribune" also said the crash evoked memories of the previous crash, noting that the coverage was "reminiscent of that of the Airblue crash" because "soon after the crash, images of the site splashed onto TV screens, with bulletin after bulletin giving detailed coverage, implicit with the promise that this tragedy will be investigated and justice will be done".
_	Gacy took McCoy—who was traveling from Michigan to Omaha—on a sightseeing tour of Chicago, and then drove him to his home with the promise that he could spend the night and be driven back to the station in time to catch his bus.
_	In "The Crystal Shard" he chooses to ally himself with the wizard Akar Kessel, on the promise that when Kessel died (which would not be far in the future in Errtu's view, even if Kessel died of old age), he would gain "Crenshinibon".
_	The First Minister has repeated on a number of occasions the promise that the dualling of the road will be complete by 2020.
_	Eruka is consequently forced to carry out various tasks for Medusa with the promise that one of these snakes be removed for every task she completes.
_	Allmusic.com said "Jeb Loy Nichols' fourth offering reveals the totality of the promise that his earlier records suggested and developed.
_	The demolition was justified with the promise that the theatre would be replaced by the Palacio de Bellas Artes, whose construction began in 1904, but was interrupted by the Mexican Revolution, and finally opened in 1934.
_	After an interview in London with General Kemball, Trenchard was granted the position of Deputy Commandant of the Southern Nigeria Regiment with the promise that he was entitled to lead all regimental expeditions.
_	The final treaty between the Allies and Bulgaria gave Greece formerly Bulgarian territories along the Aegean Sea in Thrace, with the promise that Bulgaria would have free access to the Aegean through Salonika, and through the Turkish Straits, which were to be administered by a newly created international state.
_	While controversial, the bill passed the Ohio House of Representatives, with the promise that the measure would create jobs and help lower energy prices.
_	The infomorph only assists in exchange for the promise that he be deleted after the mission is complete.
_	Cameron sold the rights for "The Terminator" to Hurd for one dollar with the promise that she would produce it only if Cameron was to direct it.
_	The First Minister has repeated on a number of occasions the promise that the dualling of the A465 will be complete by 2020.
_	The U.S. expedition included Creek Indians from Coweta, who were induced to join by the promise that they would get salvage rights to the fort if they helped in its capture.
_	The county magistrate tried to persuade Agnes to deny her faith under the promise that if she did, she would be released.
_	The company's president, Floyd De L. Brown, paid $100,000 of the $1 million down payment required to start construction on the tower, with the promise that the difference would be paid later.
_	To allay Muslim fears of Hindu domination the 'August offer' was accompanied with the promise that a future constitution would take the views of minorities into consideration.
_	In the simplest terms, the doctrines and the rituals peculiar to the Anglo-Catholics were considered, by Evangelicals such as M‘Neile, to be a blatant violations of the promise that all of the Anglican clergy routinely made: viz., to adhere to the forms of service as specified in the "Book of Common Prayer" — in particular, to what it demanded and what it disallowed — and to adhere to the "Thirty-Nine Articles of Religion".
_	Led by "King" David Hartley, the Coiners obtained real coins from publicans, sometimes on the promise that they could "grow" the investment by smelting the original metals with base ores.
_	The promise of getting Sanjay and Kajol married is forgotten when Kishorilal insults them and forgets the promise that was made years previously.
_	Zephaniah borrows Diana’s car with the promise that he and his friends will leave as soon as he returns.
_	The government launched a new anticorruption website in March 2011 with the promise that the government, Prosecutor-General office and the police will check every case.
_	Years later, when the heroine Black Canary visits the village to experience Shiva's training, a village child named Sin is held hostage by the villagers, with the promise that if Canary fails to become the warrior-protector of the village, Sin is to take her place, suggesting that Shiva's sister was once used in a similar manner.
_	This showed the promise that was to come the next year.
_	In 2004-2005, the mural was removed for the restoration, with the promise that it would be returned by the end of 2005.
_	"He just took something out of thin air, which makes me think now that he had to have had an idea that the wife was going to be part of the show, because I kind of took the job with the promise that Betty would be a part of the show.
_	In the early 1940s, Lewis wrote a monthly column for Your Life magazine that led to a contract with Funk & Wagnalls Co. -- and the promise that Funk would lend marquee value by collaborating on a book.
_	Winter agreed to leave only on the promise that he would be taken to the German Embassy.
_	She appears primarily in the myth of "Enki and Ninsikila", in which she resists the sexual advances of her father Enki by ensconcing herself inside her web, but he convinces her to let him in using a gift of fresh produce and the promise that he will marry her.
_	Anton is called to attend, but Zabulon encourages him to commit a small act of "betrayal" by not going, with the promise that he will be able to live freely with Svetlana and avoid bloodshed.
_	The narrative discusses the evil of mankind that moved God to destroy the world by the way of the flood, the preparation of the ark for certain animals, Noah, and his family, and God's guarantee (the Noahic Covenant) for the continued existence of life under the promise that he would never send another flood.
_	He cries out for forgiveness ("") but hears only the promise that he will one day be redeemed by the pure fool.
_	She beguiles him and continually asks him to spend a month with her on the promise that she will change his life for the better.
_	Scoring 3 goals in 4 games he is now confirming the promise that he had shown.
_	After Alita defeats AR-2, he has her continue with her original mission of apprehending Desty Nova with the promise that she can leave the TUNED after its completion.
_	When the matter was brought up again in 1606, severe pressure was put by Dunbar and Robert Cecil, 1st Earl of Salisbury on Balmerino to induce him to take the whole blame on himself, and on the promise that his life and estates should be secured to him he consented to exculpate the king.
_	The contract included the promise that Anheuser-Busch, recently acquired by InBev, would keep all 12 U.S. Breweries open for the life of the contract.
_	Nazir was reluctant to let Shatir go, he tried to stop Shatir with the promise that after his new Punjabi film, "Shehri Babu", with which Shatir had nothing to do, he would launch his next Urdu movie for which he would need Shatir.
_	Mr. A. Hosie, the British Consul at Chengdu, made a quick trip from Batang to the Tibetan border escorted by Chinese authorities, in September 1904, on the promise that he would not even put a foot over the border into Tibet.
_	According to Tom Watson's biographer, C. Vann Woodward, "While the hearings of the petition to commute were in progress Watson sent a friend to the governor with the promise that if Slaton allowed Frank to hang, Watson would be his 'friend', which would result in his 'becoming United States senator and the master of Georgia politics for twenty years to come.'"
_	Caleb, however, flees the estate, but is later convinced to return to defend himself with the promise that, if he can do so effectively in court, he will be freed.
_	Much like the invention of the telegraph allowed classical bits to be transported at high speed across continents, quantum teleportation holds the promise that one day, qubits could be moved likewise.
_	In 1922, Frederick L. Ackerman submitted a basic plot for the construction of a dormitory on North Campus and, with approval of the University's Architectural Advisory Board, began seeking donors with the promise that Cornell would pay for up to half of the building's construction.
_	The only face-saving concession he extracted from Congress was the promise that former president Guevara not be allowed to resume his duties.
_	We are striving towards a Nextopia that holds the promise that our greatest pleasures and adventures lie ahead.
_	In early 1932, plans for a large concrete stadium with a capacity of 25,000 persons was presented to the Mid-South Fair Association with the promise that if it were built, efforts would be made to land "big-time events of the tennis world".
_	It is later revealed he is serving as a mole for Mister Negative (a fellow Darkforce-powered villain) under the promise that he will be cured once the Maggia crime families are killed.
_	They see claims of a complete apostasy (as opposed to a widespread revolt) as a denial of the promise that Jesus made (as recorded in scripture) to be with his Church "until the end of time".
_	The remaining officers were all captured, although some, such as Cockburn, were shortly released on parole on the promise that they did not take up arms against the Royalists.
_	They sought out the "Covenant of the Ebon Vein", and were inducted on the promise that China would be freed from its oppressors.
_	The band eventually relented and changed the album's title, art and track listing, under the promise that they would be released from their contract afterward as a result.
_	Reportedly, the last rebel to lay down his arms did so on the promise that he would receive a sabre and medal from King Alexander I of Yugoslavia.
_	Dobie was lured with the promise that he need work only three months and otherwise devote himself to business.
_	The subjects—dragons, dwarfs, giants—are presented as being potent and strong at the dawn of time, but magical creatures grow weaker and eventually disappear as humans spread and demystify the world, though there is always the promise that the magic will return once again.
_	The first few plays of the fourth quarter failed to live up to the promise that had been shown in the third for the Hokies.
_	While Darius is with Mariah, Starkey asks him to come with him to help K-9, Darius agrees but only with the promise that Starkey will leave.
_	Clara is only reconciled by the promise that she will be allowed to visit Heidi in her mountains.
_	Fox promoted the episode with the promise that it was the "most bizarre" episode of "The X-Files" to ever have been shown.
_	Lutherans are taught to prepare to receive this sacrament through prayerful reflection upon their sinful nature, their need for a Savior, the promise that their sins are forgiven for the sake of Jesus' death on the Cross, and that the Eucharist gives this forgiveness to them.
_	They called for UN investigations into the use of chemical weapons with the promise that whoever had used them would be punished.
_	More precisely, these causalities are the fulfillment of the promise that God made to the models and instruments of creation, which was that "when the years equal to the number of their first born had elapsed, they would be returned to the Residence of Origin, the place of original conception, and would be adored by their posterity."
_	Alcibiades, ostensibly working for the Spartans at the time, encouraged the ideas developing among the oligarchs by claiming he could secure much needed funds for Athens from Persian satraps in western Anatolia, such as Tissaphernes (who was giving him protection) under the promise that the democracy would end.
_	Truman concluded by saying, "If we wish to inspire the peoples of the world whose freedom is in jeopardy, if we wish to restore hope to those who have already lost their civil liberties, if we wish to fulfill the promise that is ours, we must correct the remaining imperfections in our practice of democracy."
_	He manages to save her and has her board his LFO and escape with the promise that they will meet at their special place while he takes it upon himself to complete Ruri's objective.
_	After the disappointment of the 2013–14 season, Hartmann renewed his contract with the Capitals for a fourth season as player-coach, with the promise that the team would be competitive in the future.
_	When he moved to Monaco for health reasons in 1922, he believed that the climate was bad for his paintings, and he left them in his old home as a museum, with the promise that they would go to the city on his death.
_	Sentenced to death by Allied authorities in 1949, Pasquinelli was handed over to the new Italian republican government, on the promise that she would serve life imprisonment.
_	Lee lured Sarah into his flat with the promise that Billy was on the way, proving they were brothers with an old photo.
_	Frank explains to Julia that he had exhausted all sensory experiences and sought out the puzzle box, with the promise that it would open a portal to a realm of new carnal pleasures.
_	“It is a piece far out of the common, and holds out the promise that in Mr. McLellan a new power has arisen.
_	In 1350 chancellor Toqto'a attempted to reform the Yuan dynasty currency by printing out more paper money and creating large "Zhi Zheng Zhi Bao" (至正之寶) copper coins which were inscribed with the promise that these coins were backed in paper money, and that these would be in equal value.
_	They are using Maria's spirit as a homing beacon on Rahne as she was once part of the human world when she was still alive, with the promise that they will reward her service to them by fully resurrecting her.
_	The Staten Island secession movement was defused, or at least deferred, by the election on the same ballot of Rudy Giuliani as New York City mayor, who had campaigned on the promise that Staten Island's grievances would be addressed.
_	It conveyed the impression that his happiness with the mundane routine of smoking Woodbine cigarettes, eating Paris buns and drinking lemonade was made possible by the promise that at the end of the day he could enter the world of books and records..."
_	The town's extensive and noted library, known as the library of Safi-ad-din Ardabili, was taken to St. Petersburg by General Ivan Paskevich with the promise that its holdings would be brought to the Russian capital for safekeeping until they could be returned, a promise never fulfilled.
_	When Baker asked King Fahd for 15 billion dollars, the King readily agreed, with the promise that Baker ask Kuwait for the same amount.
_	Nora’s letter touched their hearts, so they sent a check for $500, with the promise that every year, on Joan’s birthday, they’d send another check in her memory.
_	Miyoharu is extremely resistant to the proposal, although when Okimi reveals that she borrowed the money for Miyoei's debut from Kusuda on the promise that he would be entitled to take her on later, Miyoharu is obliged to take it under consideration.
_	Asha begs for the FIR to not be submitted on the promise that she will give the missing amount to the man in two days' time.
_	The goal was for him to study legal education in Germany with the promise that when he returned he would be given the chair of public law and international law in Leuven.
_	There is usually the promise that the scammer will one day join the victim in the victim's home.
_	Galvanized by the problems at the terrace site and by the promise that there would be no competing schools for Catholic boys, the provincial council made plans.
_	While the straw borrower may have been lured into the transaction with the promise that he would not be liable for the mortgage payments, the straw is legally bound once the mortgage is obtained and will be responsible for making the payments.
_	They leave Janine with the promise that they will see her again that night at the Bunker.
_	Freda followed up his tape with the promise that his script could pass the censors and could be filmed in 12 days.
_	Afraid of being arrested, Brandi continues to drive home with the promise that she will get Tom help.
_	To make amends with Ambrose who had ended up in 7th place after refiring his car to finish; Gordon gave Ambrose his second RGM car the No. 77 Menards car for some Sprint Cup races and the promise that Ambrose can race in the No. 77 car any time he would like in his career.
_	The original owners of this triangular plot of land donated it to the village with the promise that it remain undeveloped as a park in the center of the growing community.
_	Josten then joins Count Nefaria's new Lethal Legion under the promise that Nefaria would greatly increase Josten's powers.
_	Privately, however, Gage sent a special commission to Washington, D.C., consisting of Southern Pacific, newspaper and shipping lawyers to negotiate a settlement with the MHS, whereby the federal government would remove Kinyoun from San Francisco with the promise that the state would secretly cooperate with the MHS in stamping out the plague epidemic.
_	After being informed of the Department of Defense's Able Danger project by U.S. Army Lieutenant Colonel Anthony Shaffer, he failed to have the 9/11 Commission investigate, despite the promise that the Commission would investigate all 9/11 related topics.
_	National campaigned on the promise that it would keep the overall structure of Labour's welfare state while moderating it to reduce the power of trade unions, increase consumer choice and generally abolish unnecessary regulation.
_	This included the promise that the Belgians would prepare the areas for independence, but the Belgians felt the area would take many decades to ready for self-rule and wanted the process to take enough time before happening.
_	Vinick accepted the offer under the condition that he would be free to shape policy at the State Department without interference from Democratic Party political operatives and on the promise that he could pick his own deputy secretary, albeit a Democratic one, and advise on the selection of all undersecretaries.
_	After the fall, the rule of God was expressed through the Law, the Judges, the King of Israel and finally the promise that God would write his law on his people's hearts (Jer 31:33).
_	When the Soviet Union became an ally later in the war as a result of the German invasion of the USSR, those party leaders such as Carr and Tim Buck who had gone underground turned themselves into the authorities in 1942 and were released after ten days on the promise that they would refrain from communist activities.
_	Selden helps her arrange for lodging for the night with her cousin Jack Stepney under the promise that she leave promptly in the morning, The ensuing social scandal ruins Lily's reputation and almost immediately causes her friends to abandon her and Aunt Julia to disinherit her.
_	The approval came with the promise that the Baltimore Civic Center which would be the largest rink in the AHL at that time, would be completed no later than November 1, 1962.
_	With the promise that Emerson could be the new "gateway to the west", the settlement grew quickly and, by 1876, a church and a school were built.
_	They recruit a third man, Phil, to assist them, with the promise that he will join the escape.
_	This section was designated despite not having 10-foot shoulders, with the promise that shoulders would be widened later.
_	In the October 1974 manifesto, this was changed to the promise that Labour would "give the British people the final say, which will be binding on the Government – through the ballot box – on whether we accept the terms and stay in or reject the terms and come out."
_	In the past, Vorselon was sentenced to life in Zordoom Prison for kidnapping Kerchu Ambassador Boogoh, but he escaped and joined forces with Dr. Nefarious under the promise that he would get his original body back once Nefarious gained control of the Great Clock.
_	Connelly and Willis lured Kent to a new development under construction with the promise that he would be able to drive Willis's Mustang 5.0 and have sex with her.
_	His father, President of the Court of Amiens, allowed him to study painting on the promise that he would also study law, which he did, eventually earning a doctorate.
_	While Spurs failed to live up to the promise that the game delivered, the losing side lost only one more league game all season and won the league title which had looked an impossible job a few short months earlier.
_	With the promise that they would be given new lands they waited unaware while Galba's army surrounded them with a ditch, to prevent them from escaping.
_	The British were allowed to return to the security of their land with the honours of war, and the promise that they leave their settlements to the west of the Alleghany mountains during the twelve months that followed.
_	"Șirineasa" started to play in black and white, Jiul colors, with the promise that at the end of the season the club will merge with Jiul Petroșani, taking its brand and record, the club basically being in the incredible situation of having three identities, two legally and a third one, from an ideological point of view.
_	The loan was made, the bulk of it for military supplies, 3 million of it in gold specie, and the promise that France would underwrite with Dutch agents a later loan for 10 million should it be needed.
_	Charles attempted to prevent her departure by demanding an inventory of her Swedish property and the promise that it would be confiscated by the state should she die unmarried.
_	Typical of the Führer's "gifts" was the cheque made out for a half-million Reichmarks presented to Field-Marshal Günther von Kluge in October 1942 together with the promise that Kluge could bill the German treasury for improvements to his estate.
_	The tenants were given the land with the promise that the peasants would be granted permanent ownership of the land once they succeeded in making it productive.
_	On 13 December 1643 Captain Thomas Sandford and eight soldiers from that army crept into Beeston at night (possibly aided by treachery) and surprised the castle governor, Captain Thomas Steele, who was so shaken by the event that he surrendered on the promise that he would be allowed to march out of the castle with honours.
_	Malaspina was able to regain the trust of Maquinna and the promise that the Spanish had the rightful title of land ownership at Nootka Sound.
_	He managed a career high 34 RBIs, but failed to live up to the promise that made him one of the top Phillies' prospects when he first came up to the majors.
_	Trauma is kept on as the Camp H.A.M.M.E.R. counselor, against his will with the promise that if he leaves his mother will be killed, but if he stays they will cure her insanity.
_	His second release may have been secured through the promise that he would move to Chicago where he had relatives.
_	, author Ally Carter posted mini-excerpts of the book on her blog, with the promise that while they would be in the book, they might be misleading.
_	According to The Tain Cuchulainn agrees to make a mock flight from Fergus his foster father in return for the promise that Fergus will fly from him at another time.
_	He takes up life as an ordinary worker, then marries Leora with her family supporting him based on the promise that he would take up private practice as the only doctor in tiny Wheatsylvania, North Dakota.
_	An important component of the "bakt" was the promise that Makuria would secure Egypt's southern border against raids by desert nomads, like the Beja.
_	Baartman was a South African immigrant who came to Europe based on the promise that she could become wealthy by displaying her body for Europeans.
_	When the messenger realizes that the young man is immune to the material temptations such an offer carries, he manages to persuade him with the promise that he will be reunited with his mother.
_	However, with the promise that the financial issues would soon be resolved, the band (with new guitarist Willie Blackmore) went into Majestic Studios in Clapham and rush recorded the album (along with the single "Sweet Little Rock And Roller") in one day.
_	The Squires government collapsed and Alderdice swept to power in the ensuing June election on the promise that if elected, his government would examine the possibility of suspending the constitution and having a commission administer the country until conditions improved.
_	In December 1864, with Union General Sherman's troops approaching Savannah, Lamar took President Lincoln's loyalty oath (sometimes called the Proclamation of Amnesty) to uphold the United States constitution, in return for the promise that all his property rights would be restored.
_	Cankili II was under the Portuguese made the governor of Jaffna in 1591 and paid tribute to them on the promise that he had no contact with the Karaiyar kinglet, who was wielding the power of the Jaffna Peninsula at that time.
_	Malaspina was able to regain the trust of Maquinna and the promise that the Spanish had the rightful title of land ownership at Nootka Sound.
_	One of DNF's conditions for dissolving itself was the promise that all DNF members in the Reichstag, the civil service, and the police be allowed to continue with their jobs and that the rest of the DNF membership be left in peace, a promise that Hitler put into writing.
_	In the early 1990s, Schoemehl worked with business groups to develop a new ice hockey arena (now known as the Scottrade Center) on the site of the city's Kiel Auditorium, with the promise that the developer would renovate the adjacent opera house.
_	More precisely, these causalities are the fulfillment of the promise that God made to the models and instruments of creation, which was that "when the years equal to the number of their first born had elapsed, they would be returned to the Residence of Origin, the place of original conception, and would be adored by their posterity."
_	She then leaves again, with the promise that she will be back for Christmas.
_	However, on the morning of 21 July Hoche and Sombreuil began negotiations and the Royalists capitulated shortly afterwards, apparently with the promise that the lives of all the Royalist troops would be spared.
_	Another anonymous review by a certain A. F. in the newspaper "Diário Português" of July 1935 argued that Estudantes's greatest value was its spontaneity and the promise that it and its young creators represented for the future of the cinema industry in Brazil.
_	The youths were then forced by Corll to fight each other with the promise that the youth who beat the other to death would be allowed to live.
_	He beg the virgin to spare his life and that of his companions with the promise that they would build a chapel in her honor as soon as they landed on the shore.
_	One summer, Bart enthusiastically attends Kamp Krusty, largely because of the promise that he would get to spend his summer with Krusty.
_	He betrays his kind to the Watchdogs, helping them track and kill other Inhumans, with the promise that they would kill him when they are done.
_	The FBI agent gets to Anna and convinces her to leak information about the courier's progress on the promise that the FBI can help fix the mess.
_	The scholarship is awarded to students in Oregon that are enrolled in medicine or nursing studies, and it is granted based on the promise that the students will work in Oregon after their graduation.
_	The following day, Crazy Horse was brought back to Camp Robinson with the promise that he could meet with the post commander.
_	The youth agreed to lure Voorhees to a secluded spot, spray Mace in his face and beat the youth with the promise that if he did so, he would be paid $300.
_	The protracted negotiations resulted in the payment of the arrears of Byzantine tribute, the promise that Constantine VII would marry one of Simeon's daughters, and, most importantly, Simeon's official recognition as Emperor of the Bulgarians by Patriarch Nicholas in the Blachernae Palace.
_	Their loans are backed, not by goods or property, but by moral collateral: the promise that the group stands behind each individual loan.
_	The domestic game seemed to have all but deteriorated and hopes of a return to the promise that Zimbabwe showed in the 1990s looked to be forlorn.
_	The paper was bought by Samuel Bennett and William Hanson and resumed publication in May 1859 with the promise that "The Empire … will continue under the new management to advocate the same great principles by which it has hitherto been distinguished".
_	The true and global revitalisation of interest in the concept dates from 1903, when Pelham Warner took a team to Australia with the promise that he would regain "the ashes".
_	In this book, Jonah, Katherine, Chip, and Chip's real brother, Alex, have one warning of disaster before they are sent back to 15th century to the Tower of London, with the promise that they can return to their home in the 21st century if they can repair history.
_	She invites the group to become state troopers again, with the promise that they will become full-time officers should they succeed at this task.
_	"With hints of magic powers, complex international relations, and a variety of twisted pasts, fantasy and romance fans alike will want to pick this up, particularly with the promise that this series will only get more interesting as it gets going." — Rebecca Silverman, "Anime News Network".
_	They gave Garland a five-year lease to strip mine the coal, in return for a royalty, and the promise that the land would be restored once they were done.
_	He had taken some earlier steps in January 1902 when he sent his personal secretary to Vienna with the promise that it would solve the question of his successor in agreement with the neighboring monarchy by adopting one of the descendants of female line of Obrenovićs, living in Austria-Hungary.
_	Al-Ghazali, a prolific Sufi theologian, wrote that Tawba is the repentance of a sin with the promise that it will not be repeated and that the sinner will return to God.
_	Shima gives Hikaru his cellphone number with the promise that if Hikaru gets good grades, he can have dates and phone calls with Shima.
_	The play had been an enormous hit on Broadway and touring and Schenck paid stage director John McDermott $25,000 with the promise that he would direct the film.
_	The transaction was carried out on the promise that the bridge should be maintained in good condition in perpetuity.
_	Llywelyn agreed to help, in return for full recognition of his title and the promise that he could keep all military gains.
_	Their friendship begins to blossom into romantic interest for one another as they grow older, and Dobry leaves the village with the promise that he will one day marry her.
_	Major George Madison, a United States officer still on the battlefield, persuaded Procter to accept a surrender on the promise that all would be protected as prisoners of war.
_	William Barclay, a well-known Christian author, wrote: "The promise that Peter would have the keys to the Kingdom was the promise that Peter would be the means of opening the door to God for thousands upon thousands of people in the days to come.
_	The State responded with the promise that if Haynes did not return voluntarily, they would pursue extradition despite law enforcement's having no money to pay for Haynes' return.
_	A message arrives from Queen Starsha of planet Iscandar, providing Earth with plans to build a superluminal engine and the promise that, if Earthlings can reach Iscandar, enduring what obstacles the Gamilons might put in their way, the Queen will give them a machine — the Cosmo DNA — that can neutralize the deadly radioactivity and restore the Earth's ecosystem.
_	The term "pledge" originates from the promise that a contributor makes to send in funding at regular intervals for a certain amount of time.
_	Daufer was returned with the promise that his choice of a monastic vocation would be respected.
_	It was in July 1876 that the Medical School agreed to affiliate with the College in return for the promise that it would be supplied with additional space to expand, a promise which was eventually honoured three years later.
_	More than one million people invested money in the company, purchasing and raising boxes of ants with the promise that they could sell the ants back for a profit, before it was exposed as a ponzi scheme in 2007.
_	However, a priest decided to turn them in to the police, with the promise that they wouldn't be tortured.
_	Severin and Simone approach Xander to steal the "Vampyr" book from Buffy, with the promise that going back in time will also save the life of Xander's girlfriend Dawn Summers who is currently dying without magic in the world.
_	An additional 20,000 Austrians were paroled on the promise that they would not fight against France until exchanged.
_	Their sister organisation, the Integrated Education Fund (IEF), obtained funding for the college for a period of three months only, with the promise that the IEF would fund-raise for the college to help maintain it throughout its first year.
_	However, the summer before he was to start at Harvard, G. Stanley Hall, the president of Clark University, offered him a job as professor of experimental psychology for three years with the promise that if his work was satisfactory, his position would be made permanent.
_	Knox presented the fifteen-minute slot for over ten years, always signing off with the promise that any calls to the police "can be in confidence".
_	A typical example was a cheque made out for a half-million Reichsmarks, presented to Field Marshal Günther von Kluge in October 1942, together with the promise that he could bill the German treasury for any and all "improvements" that he might wish to make to his estate.
_	Copin's confession was probably on return for the promise that his life should be spared.
_	Following the end of the Boer War, Trenchard decided to apply for service in the West African Frontier Force and was granted the position of Deputy Commandant of the Southern Nigeria Regiment with the promise that he was entitled to lead all regimental expeditions.
_	According to a somewhat doubtful story a Sakya cleric, the Choje of Ngor, gave religious instructions to Norzang in return for the promise that the Rinpung lord would fulfil three wishes of the Choje.
_	Shortly before his attack on Shirvan, Ismail had made the Georgian kings Constantine II and Alexander I of respectively the kingdoms of Kartli and Kakheti, attack the Ottoman possessions near Tabriz, on the promise that he would cancel the tribute that Constantine was forced to pay to the Ak Koyunlu once Tabriz was captured.
_	Glotzer claimed that the pair actually sold two tickets outside the theater with the promise that if the buyers did not like the film, they could ask Castle Rock for a refund.
_	Heracles (now a god) or Athena then persuaded Philoctetes to join the Achaeans again (with the promise that he will be healed) and he agreed to go with Diomedes.
_	In 2002, the company was bought for £23.5m by the media company Chrysalis, who trumpeted their purchase with the promise that they would lift the listenership to at least one million from around 700,000 (LBC had enjoyed an audience of more than two million in the early 1980s).
_	After an extended rant, Gilmour's calmer voice returns, chuckling warmly with the promise that his followers will ""see Britannia rule again"" and ""send our coloured cousins home again,"" with Waters concluding ""All you need to do is follow the worms!""
_	In the midst of the recession, he insisted that Agoglia take 3 Peterbilt trucks of his choosing for only the promise that one day, John and his sons could join Agoglia in a response.
_	After a short siege, Gaveston surrendered to the earls of Pembroke and Surrey, on the promise that he would not be harmed.
_	He was offered a contract by manager Robbie Neilson, with the promise that he would also get the chance to learn how to coach at the club.
_	This proved initially successful until Gary and Sarah arrived back and talked Jack out of it before sending him away with the promise that he never saw Phelan.
_	If you are impatient, you’ll dread wondering if some of the songs are going anywhere, but most listeners will be fully rewarded with the promise that even the most ominous music on here is leading up to something transportive."
_	Because this drug combination has the additional quality of being hepatically cleared, it holds the promise that patients suffering from chronic kidney disease and HCV could receive a safe, non-sofosbuvir-based treatment in the near future.
_	It is afterwards decided that Millicent should attend a boarding school in France, and Silas sends her away with the promise that Maud is to join her after three months.
_	Mariana followed shortly afterward with her children, but only after obtaining the promise that they would return to Chile as soon as possible.
_	In 1993, he allegedly raped a woman again, his defence was sponsored by Benchmark Research and Technology, and in an act of total impunity, he was released on parole with the promise that he would never step on American soil again.
_	The jurisdiction of the Holy Roman Empire was definitively reasserted when Jaromír of Bohemia was granted fief of the Kingdom of Bohemia by Emperor King Henry II of the Holy Roman Empire, with the promise that he hold it as a vassal once he re-occupied Prague with a German army in 1004, ending the rule of Boleslaw I of Poland.
_	To allay Muslim fears of Hindu domination the 'August offer' had been accompanied with the promise that a future constitution would take the views of minorities into consideration.
_	More precisely, these causalities are the fulfillment of the promise that God made to the models and instruments of creation, which was that "when the years equal to the number of their first born had elapsed, they would be returned to the Residence of Origin, the place of original conception, and would be adored by their posterity."
_	The film ends on the promise that the two redheads will soon go on their first proper date together.
_	Prussia relied on the promise that Francisca Christina would grant the Protestant city freedom of religion.
_	With the promise that Neia would remain in prison for five years, Anjuman’s father relented.
_	When they left they gave the stones to the locals with the promise that as long as the stones were put out to look over the glen at Bealltainn and put back into the shelter and made secure for the winter at Samhainn then the glen would continue to be fertile.
_	Bhishma politely refused saying that he was ready to give up his life at the command of his teacher but not the promise that he had made.
_	With the astrologer expected to have knowledge and awareness of the mundane cycles that outline the background principles of the personal horoscope, Ptolemy closes this book with the promise that the next will supply "with due order" the procedure which allows predictions based on the horoscopes of individuals.
_	The company was believed to be operating on a Ponzi scheme that had people buy into the company through the purchase of pigeon chicks, with the promise that all future chicks would be purchased.
_	Blackborow proved an asset to the ship as a steward and was eventually signed on, though under the promise that he would be the first eaten should they run out of food or should the men starve.
_	When in 1772 Buffon became seriously ill and the promise that his son (then only 8) should succeed him as director of the Jardin became clearly impracticable and was withdrawn, the King raised Buffon’s estates in Burgundy to the status of a county – and thus Buffon (and his son) became a Count.
_	Stephen was indentured to Harman Fagan with the promise that Stephen would be permitted to attend school at least three months a year..”
_	After three Task Force members return to the case, they head with Ryuzaki to meet Shien, who has been lured with the promise that Ryuzaki will reveal his face and the team's Death Notes.
_	However, former leader Alec Douglas-Home was still able to urge Scots to vote 'no' to Labour's proposal in 1979, with the promise that a Conservative government would offer a "better" bill.
_	"The Money Doubler" (1976) is a novel about a trickster who convinces people to part with their cash on the promise that he will be able to use "African science" to double it.
_	Working as a field superintendent for Doheny for about a year, O'Donnell too saw the promise that the oil fields held and decided to go into business for himself forming a partnership drilling oil wells with Max H. Whittier.
_	Agincourt also held out the promise that Henry's pretensions to the French throne might be realised.
_	But with the collapse of France the old fears and jealousies against Austria were revived in full force, and Bavaria only agreed to these cessions (treaty of Munich, 16 April 1816) under the promise that, in the event of the powers ignoring her claim to the Baden succession in favour of that of the line of the counts of Hochberg, she should receive also the Palatinate on the right bank of the Rhine.
_	In the Summer of 2010, Scream introduced the "Yellow Card For Life" – costing £5, with the promise that it will never expire.
_	Agdistis now repented her deed, and obtained from Zeus the promise that the body of Attis should not become decomposed or disappear.
_	He does not wish to leave his command, but his friend, fireman Jack Allen, finally induces him to go on the promise that he, Jack, will call later.
_	With this new evidence, Wei agrees on the promise that they will discuss reparations for the loss of lives and property.
_	John meets with Kelly to inform her of what she has inherited, and Kelly invites John to tea, which makes John smile for the first time in the film, under the promise that his loneliness will end.
_	Hoping to avoid the sack of Rome, Emperor Valentinian III sent three envoys, the high civilian officers Gennadius Avienus and Trigetius, as well as Pope Leo I, who met Attila at Mincio in the vicinity of Mantua, and obtained from him the promise that he would withdraw from Italy and negotiate peace with the emperor.
_	The crumbling Ottoman Empire was enticed to join in the conflict with the promise that a victory would yield them the return of her recently lost territories, while Germany hoped the involvement of the Turks would tie down forces of the Entente far from Western Europe.
_	Before accepting the dignity of Patriarch, Tarasios had demanded and obtained the promise that the veneration of icons would be restored in the church.
_	The only face-saving concession he extracted from Congress was the promise that Guevara not be allowed to resume his duties as president.
_	The Turner family were introduced with the promise that they would be hiding secrets.
_	He signed a two-year contract with the Flames on the promise that he would stay in Birmingham unless the team needed his services as a result of injury to other players.
_	... when achieved it is an arresting sound, confirming the rock-like certainty of the promise that we shall eventually reside with God.
_	And that’s the promise that "HIMYM"s final season holds."
_	The song ends with the promise that "You will win" if you just stick with the union.
_	Shackleton named the hill that provided this vantage point "Mount Hope", for the promise that it provided.
_	An Ithorian named Chodo Habat employed the help of a Jedi Exile during the Telos Restoration Project with the promise that he would cure the exile's "wound in the Force" if the Jedi Exile foiled Czerka Corporation's attempts to take over the restoration project.
_	Through personal conversations with the composer, Klein reported that Spence was convinced to sign a contract that relinquished all of the rights to his music to NFL Films under the promise that the enterprise would return the document to the composer.
_	Although Remy admitted to threatening Guyette and the judge, Neil Walker, admitted that probation did not seem to be working for Remy, the case was continued without formal judgment with the promise that it would dismissed altogether if Remy behaved properly and remained in counseling.
_	The general consensus among fans was that this was not a huge step forward for the band and the production was somewhat understated, but it still had the promise that would be delivered on their next album.
_	In early 1958, Desi Arnaz convinced CBS to purchase "Desilu Playhouse" with the promise that a bi-monthly "Lucille Ball-Desi Arnaz Show" (later rebroadcast as "The Lucy-Desi Comedy Hour") would be among the dramas, comedies and musicals planned for the show.
_	The German commander of Paramythia, in need of the support of the Cham population, repeated to the Albanian community the promise that the region would become part of Greater Albania after the war.
_	With 19 years-old, he moved to Lisbon to play for Sporting, with the promise that they help him find a job, which they never did.
_	The victor in this contest was the letter "bet," the initial of the word בראשית, while "alef" was comforted by the promise that with it, as the first letter of אנכי, the revelation of the Ten Commandments should begin (comp. the recension of the Midrash of the Alphabet in A. Jellinek, "B. H." iii. 50 et seq.; Gen. R. i., ed. Theodor, p. 9).
_	When Nicola takes a train to Bradford to spearhead a PR stunt in the hopes of improving her image, Malcolm encourages Ben Swain to resign from his position as Shadow Minister for DoSAC to precipitate the putsch, with the promise that he will re-enter Cabinet as Foreign Secretary.
_	Bishop Simon was seized and brought before the shah and was offered gifts to make a token obeisance to the sun, and when he refused, they cunningly tempted him with the promise that if he alone would apostatize his people would not be harmed, but that if he refused he would be condemning not just the church leaders but all Christians to destruction.
_	In "The Verge", Adi Robertson writes: ""Walkaway" imagines a future shaped by the same problems and possibilities Doctorow’s been playing with for years: the threat of ubiquitous surveillance and artificial scarcity, and the promise that almost any technology can be repurposed and turned against its creator".
_	He lets them go with the promise that they'll plant one at the grave of his son on the Armenian side.
_	If the promise that there was a tanker in situe had been performed, she might still have been found worthless or not susceptible of profitable salvage operations or of any salvage operations at all.
_	He entered the Confederate States Army on the promise that the Confederacy would support an Indian state if it won the war, and achieved the rank of colonel.
_	Typically, therefore, the advocates of peaceful market trade blame "everything but the market" for the explosions of mass violence that occur, with the promise that, if people would just sit down and negotiate a deal, they wouldn't have to use force to get what they want.
_	With the promise that this money would be spent mainly on the outlying centres, eight of the ten still self-administering municipalities – including Boppard itself – came round to seeing the merger as the right way to proceed.
_	The Textus Receptus presents Jesus' intention to prepare a place for His disciples as a separate sentence from the point about the availability of many rooms, whereas, in other versions, the promise that a place will be prepared is directly linked to the teaching that there are many rooms in the Father's house.
_	Pierre insists on driving Arlette home and stops along the way to confess how much he likes her; he kisses her and gives her flowers from his garden before dropping her off at the baron's house and extracts the promise that she'll meet him at the train station the next day, as they are both (supposedly) going to Geneva, where she claims to attend boarding school.
_	He leaves Ludhiana, with the promise that they will be back 5 months later for the wedding.
_	Despite the promise that the Algatron represented, and the ways in which Oswald and Golueke "understood that the closed environment of the space capsule was itself just the a microcosm of the closed system of the earth's biosphere," the technology would never get past the prototype stage.
_	In a battle that put to the test, the promise that the gates of Hell would not prevail.
_	This forced M. L. Holbrook to pay $2,000 and W. M. Killingsworth to put another $1,000 behind the project, with the promise that it would be returned in due time.
_	When Henry Lucas, president of the newest major league, the Union Association, could only find seven teams for his league, he convinced the team, then part of the Inter-State Association, to join the league, with the promise that the Pennsylvania Railroad would provide some backing.
_	After the battle was over, the promise that Jackson had made to the enslaved men had evaporated into thin air.
_	Rossi enclosed sketches by California sculptor Joseph (Jo) Mora, with the promise that a finished design, and a model, would follow.
_	The space was sold via aggressive telemarketing with the promise that the space could be sold on at a potentially increased price at a later date.
_	At the same time, he induced the Georgian kings Constantine II and Alexander I, of respectively Kartli and Kakheti, to attack the Ottoman possessions near Tabriz, on the promise that he would cancel the tribute that Constantine was forced to pay to the Ak Koyunlu once Tabriz was captured.
_	Immediately after the 1965 season, Fairbanks was offered a job at Missouri with the promise that he would be the head coach within four years.
_	In 2015, Antonio del Castillo offered Carcaño 18,000 euro if he pinpointed the exact location of the body, with the promise that he would not seek additional charges against him and that he could spend it in Seville or wherever he wished, after his excarceration.
_	KG feeds JB's fantasy by pretending to be famous with a self-named band ("The Kyle Gass Project"), and exploits him to do work such as cleaning his apartment and buying him weed (under the promise that JB can audition for his fictitious band.)
_	The only face-saving concession he extracted from Congress was the promise that Guevara not be allowed to resume his duties as president.
_	The statement concluded with the promise that "if the Provisional IRA were to cease its campaign of terror, the Ulster Volunteer Force would no longer deem it necessary to continue with their military operations".
_	Miguel stops Anya from going after Jade alone with the promise that Anya can punish him afterwards.
_	Mr. Hadden had the idea to start news magazine of his own so Mr. Steuart granted him a leave of absence from the Baltimore News-Post with the promise that if the magazine should not work out that he could return to Baltimore and have his position back.
_	Further, they reneged on the promise that they made to secure Former Qin assistance—ceding the Luoyang region to Former Qin.
_	He flees to the Bahamas but is tracked down by Schaambergen and returned to the Netherlands, with the promise that Yolanda is found.
_	The Spanish commander initially demanded the release of all Spanish captives, the handover of Fort Malajoe, 6,000 golden ducats and the promise that Van Caerden would never return.
_	At the age of 13 she was taken—essentially kidnapped—from her rural village in Mizque and brought to the city of Cochabamba to work, with the promise that she would be given in return the schooling and care her campesino parents could not provide.
_	Clinton was also against running because when she was running for senator, she made the voters the promise that she would complete her full senate term.
_	In the end, on 4 October 1821, Pharmakis surrendered on the promise that his life would be spared.
_	With Max disposed of upon being imprisoned in Paititi's darkest dungeon by the mummy inhabitants, the chief mummy releases Tad, Sara, and the Professor with the promise that they will not reveal what they know about the city.
_	When Chitra tried to console him, he blames her that she did not keep up the promise that he, Chitra, Karthik, and his parents to live together.
_	The Bogg ghost manages to capture Scully, but Scully pleads with him to free him long enough to help his friends, with the promise that he'll return to face his punishment.
_	He ran on the promise that he would stick to press the government to tackle issues affecting the Baker Lake, Nunavut and not join the Executive council in order to stay in the constituency rather than move to Iqaluit the capital.
_	Indira reveals to Murthy that Vyasaraya paid Rs.1000/- to her poor mother with the promise that he'll ensure that Indira joins a drama company.
_	She then leaves Satoru with his cut of the profits, but with the promise that she may come back to him someday.
_	After perfecting the Reanimation Jutsu, using it to bring back Madara Uchiha as his personal trump card, Kabuto forces Obito Uchiha into a tenuous alliance with him under the promise that he can have Sasuke once they win the war against the Ninja Alliance.
_	The McLaren team told Berger to let Senna through and thus protect him with the promise that Senna will let him back ahead on the last lap if they stay 1–2.
_	In the early 1990s, Schoemehl worked with business groups to develop a new hockey arena (now known as the Scottrade Center) on the site of the city's Kiel Auditorium, with the promise that the developer would renovate the adjacent Kiel Opera House.
_	Ray sells land to Joe on the promise that Joe can use Ray's driveway and bridge to the main road at any time, but Ray does not include the easement in the deed to the land.
_	With a large number of Muslim countries are currently classified among the group of countries with emerging markets that are projected to register rapid growth, the promise that Islamic economies hold for global economic growth and profitability is well recognized.
_	This included the promise that he would be treated as an ally and a friend, and not a prisoner of war.
_	Tormé flew from England to Los Angeles with the promise that the job was his, even being paid an advance by Jet before leaving England.
_	He leaves with the promise that he will one day return to reveal his secrets of flight.
_	However, on June 15, 2018, Microsoft retroactively modified its support documents to remove the promise that this bug would be resolved, replacing it with a statement suggesting that users obtain a newer processor.
_	Lanval becomes very sullen and almost depressed because he is longing for his lover to come and prove herself and to prove that the promise that they made with each other was true.
_	Grey replied that Britain needed her continental allies more than they needed her, and imperial interests could not incur the risk (e.g., by reneging on the promise that Russia was to have control of the Turkish Straits) that they might choose to make a separate peace, which would leave Germany dominant on the continent.
_	For his services the king extorted various concessions from Innocent VII, among them the promise that he would not reach any accommodation with the rival Pope in Avignon that would compromise Ladislaus' claims to Naples, which had been challenged until very recently by Louis II of Anjou.
_	He has opposed and challenged the teaching of the Charismatic Movement that New Testament sign gifts are still extant, arguing that the Bible contains the promise that it is both sufficient and complete, rendering new revelation both redundant and dangerous.
_	For several years he showed little of the promise that would eventually make him such a success, but he continued to gain experience riding trials and platers, then in the 1842 season his fortunes started to improve with 23 winners.
_	Despite the promise that he should be returned to his own country, Joseph and the remnant of his band were deported to Oklahoma, where they wasted away so rapidly that in 1885 the few who survived were transferred to the Colville reservation in Washington.
_	In December 2009, WECB continued its holiday music past Christmas, with the promise that "one more gift" would be presented at 3 PM on December 31; along with that announcement, cryptic advertisements asking "Hey!
_	As Cantrell had already spent a year searching for a label that would take his album, he compromised and condensed his work on the promise that later on it would be released in its entirety.
_	She states that in 215 BC, the senate had to turn to 'those who had increased their property from public contracts' to financially support Spanish armies with the promise that they would be reimbursed.
_	Christians also argue that the promise that the Messiah would descend from Solomon is conditional.(1 Kings 9:4-7; 1 Chron. 28:7) Christians point to Solomon violating this condition.
_	Treaty 9 between them and the Mishkeegogamang (among other groups) set aside two pieces of land for reserves (Osnaburgh 63A and 63B) with the promise that the people would not necessarily have to live on the reserves and would have full use of all of their traditional lands.
_	Henry of Schweinfurt had supported the election of Henry II in return for the promise that he could succeed to Bavaria.
_	During his campaign he had garnered the support of many Latino voters with the promise that if he were elected mayor, he would appoint a Latino to replace him on the council.
_	Iku reluctantly agrees to let him go, with the promise that they will stay in touch.
_	He dispatches five mysterious individuals with the promise that the one who brings it to him will get all he possesses.
_	After Thorn is placated by his rapid elevation (with the promise that his proposal isn’t dropped) the position of Minister for Health is given to Leslie Potts, whose smoker’s cough prevents him from expressing his agreement.
_	Pandi agrees to help her in her mission, with the promise that he will hold Killi's shoulders while she stabs him.
_	Those masses are carried out and are made as a tribute to the promise that Don Diego de Vargas made to La Conquistadora, and is carried through until September which includes the burning of Zozobra, also known as "Old Man Gloom", a 50 ft/15.2m tall marionette that symbolizes the hardships and despair of the past year.
_	This was an opportunity for Charles IV of France to strengthen the Lorrainer ties to France and he quickly procured the duke's release on the promise that Lorraine would not interfere in imperial affairs.
_	They were encouraged to volunteer on the promise that all past crimes would be wiped out by exemplary bravery in combat.
_	In August, 2007, Fordham announced it would sell the Marymount campus, to the disappointment of many alumnae since the University had purchased the college with the promise that it would try to continue to operate it as a women's institution.
_	Hendrix however, presented Ayers with an acoustic Gibson J-200 guitar on the promise that he continue his songwriting.
_	The project ultimately took until 1980 to complete because of disputes with the United States about certain guarantees that Belgrade had to sign off on before it could receive nuclear materials (which included the promise that they would not be sold to third parties or used for anything but peaceful purposes).
_	Phil explains that he is keeping the promise that he made with Dennis' wife Sharon (Letitia Dean) to avenge Johnny for Dennis's murder, which Johnny had ordered.
_	Hobart Conselline (of the Consellines whose sub-family, the Morrellines, were responsible for the profiteering off inferior rejuvenation drugs in "Winning Colors") successfully manipulates the emergency Council meeting called after the assassination to have himself appointed Speaker, buying off Harlis with the promise that the judges appointed will be favorable to Harlis's lawsuits.
_	They, however, continued their opposition and on occasion of the imperial capitulation of Emperor Leopold II (1790) and that of Emperor Franz II (1792) obtained the promise that their complaints concerning the nunciatures would be attended to as soon as possible by a decree of the Diet.
_	Rocksteady and Bebop both volunteered to undergo the procedure (though neither was particularly aware of what it would entail) first with the promise that it would allow them to exact revenge on the Turtles.
_	Now Maria and her mother have conspired to get Adeel married to Maria by falsely alleging him of relations with Maria on the promise that he would marry her.
_	On 21 December 1847, Abdelkader surrendered to General Louis de Lamoricière in exchange for the promise that he would be allowed to go to Alexandria or Acre.
_	Lekkes received a 7-year prison sentence with the promise that he would receive a new identity and police protection for the rest of his life when he was released, and as a result Matticks pleaded guilty in 2002 rather than face extradition to the United States, where he was wanted on charges of smuggling cocaine.
_	The island was donated to the French government with the promise that a national park, the Port-Cros National Park, would be created on the island.
_	Entreri soon discovers that the city is in the iron grip of a corrupt high priest who impoverishes the people through fear demanding they pay indulgences in exchange for the promise that their dead children will go to a pleasant afterlife.
_	Boston police attempted to arrest Richard for assault following the incident, but Bruins officials persuaded them to withdraw on the promise that the NHL would handle the situation.
_	It was signed into law by then-U.S. President Barack Obama in July 2010, marking the occasion with the promise that "the American people will never again be asked to foot the bill for Wall Street's mistakes – there will be no more taxpayer-funded bailouts.
_	Meanwhile, the provincial government adopted a policy of de-institutionalization of the mentally ill, leading to the mass discharge of Riverview Hospital's patients, with the promise that they would be integrated into the community.
_	The release was announced after the British government supposedly sent a letter of apology to the Iranian government, accepting the breaching of their border, the illegal insertion of military units in Iran and the promise that Iranian territory would never be violated again.
_	Gandhi and Nehru obtained from Subhas Bose the promise that the radicals would not create another Surat-like pandemonium during the forthcoming session of the Congress Party at Kolkata where the British would receive an ultimatum that if Dominion Status was not granted by 31 December 1929, Gandhi would launch an agitation.
_	After a brief kiss, Chrissie strips him naked in the toilets of The Queen Victoria public house, on the promise that she will soon join him.
_	During World War I, Bradbeer served in the Sportsmen's Battalion, part of what were called the Pals Battalions which were specially constituted battalions of the British Army composed of men who had enlisted together in local recruiting drives, with the promise that they would be able to serve alongside their friends, neighbors and colleagues ("pals"), rather than being arbitrarily allocated to battalions.
_	Micko at first refused to give himself up, and with only three other leaders alive, they submitted on the promise that they would not be killed.
_	The previous ownership, Tom Hicks and George N. Gillett, Jr., had become extremely unpopular among Liverpool fans for his failure to deliver on the promise of a new stadium or on the promise that no debt would be placed onto the club, as well as disrespectful treatment of its manager and front office.
_	Hicks became extremely unpopular among Liverpool fans for his failure to deliver on the promise of a new stadium or on the promise that no debt would be placed onto the club and for his allegedly misleading statements about planned and past investment in players.
_	In simulated battles during 1938 the system was demonstrated to be so useful that the Ministry responded by providing Bellini-Tosi systems with the promise that CRT versions would replace them as soon as possible.
_	Cable recruits Fantomex as part of his new X-Force team with the promise that he'll help Fantomex find Cluster and Weapon XIII.
_	Balboa is eventually able to convince Goldmill to train him anyway, with the promise that this would be their last fight.
_	Preval has also sought the votes of Lavalas members on the promise that he will not oppose the return of Jean Bertrand Aristide from South Africa.
_	As of 2006, Pierre Brassard is hosting a satirical television show at the SRC called "En attendant Ben Laden", which started in 2005 with the promise that the show would end the day of the capture of Osama Bin Laden.
_	The film tells the story of a middle-aged woman, suffering from unrequited love for the local town sheriff; however, she falls for a con man who comes to town with the promise that he can make it rain.
_	The value proposition is the promise that the business will give the consumer to assure best possible value.
_	Senator Clark returns to Washington with the promise that funding will not be cut off to the project, leaving General Kirk in charge.
_	Vernet was anxious to establish the colony quickly due to the promise that it would be free from taxation if it could be established within 3 years.
_	David that the promise that they made to each other after their divorce, saying that they'd be there for one another.
_	He was sent back into the camp with the promise that the internees would be rescued.
_	She's basically telling them the promise that one of the great Khals had made years before and saying now is the time to live up to that promise and fulfill it."
_	Despite the promise that they would appear again on a regular basis, negative reader reaction to this amusing conceptual mistake decided otherwise.
_	Rovers adhere to the promise that is used in the Scout section onwards, and the motto "Service".
_	On 7 August of that year Prince George of Hesse-Darmstadt sent (a Spanish military commander supporting the Habsburg candidate Archduke Charles of Austria as successor to the Spanish throne) to Ceuta with part of the Anglo-Dutch fleet, calling on the city to surrender in the name of the Archduke with the promise that the siege would then be over.
_	The Scholarship currently costs the Florida Lottery more than $436.1 million, with about 170,000 students taking advantage of the program this ensures the promise that lottery money will be used to supplement education.
_	He had told Williams this during the 1950s on the promise that she not reveal this information until all the deputies had died.
_	The Reformed Church members agreed to leave the Hôtel and their other strongholds, abandon their arms and possessions inside, and leave Toulouse forever under the promise that they would be unmolested.
_	The Jews remaining in Schmallenberg were then forced to sign over the title deeds of their property with the promise that it would bring their husbands and sons back.
_	In 1887, Dann was hired to teach penmanship in the public schools in Ithaca, New York with the promise that he could also begin instruction in music.
_	Lord Krishna broke his vow to protect Arjuna and also to fulfill the promise that his ardent devotee Bheeshma had made.
_	Once the station's transmitter was up and running, WRQQ, preparing for its official launch, began stunting with jukebox sound effects and clips from songs from all genres of music with the promise that "an all-new radio station is coming to 97.1 FM".
_	It also ordered military commanders to begin armistice negotiations with the insurgents with the promise that they could participate in the restored representative government.
_	Dardik charged MacFarlane and her family $100,000, with the promise that not only could he cure her multiple sclerosis, but also that he would personally be available for the treatment sessions.
_	It conveyed the impression that his happiness with the mundane routine of smoking Woodbine cigarettes, eating Paris buns and drinking lemonade was made possible by the promise that at the end of the day he could enter the world of books and records ... ".
_	Because of his reputation, Hansen is able to talk Solbarth and his gang members into surrendering with the promise that their lives would be spared.
_	His father wanted him to become a district collector and Anand took the promise that the next time he will meet his father he will be a district collector.
_	However, Spot slips in and steals back the evidence of Oscorp's tests, revealing being Mister Negative's mole in the Hood's gang under the promise that he will be cured once they get their revenge on the Maggia.
_	He saw the promise that the ridge had for development as a township and partitioned the land into plots.
_	After Pollock unsuccessfully attempts to kill President Palmer, he and the bomb maker release Lennox, on the promise that he will stay quiet.
_	The Emperor, secretly allied with the Hoskanners, orders Linkam to take over Duneworld for two years with the promise that if they produce more melange, then they will receive the concession — else it will go permanently to the Hoskanners.
_	The elite "Yinqiang" corps from Xingtang, who served as Emperor Zhuangzong's personal guard corps, were already resentful because Emperor Zhuangzong had not delivered on the promise that they would be heavily rewarded with wealth after he destroyed Later Liang.
_	"Burglar proof grave vaults made of steel" were sold with the promise that loved ones' remains would not be one of the 40,000 bodies "mutilated every year on dissecting tables in medical colleges in the United States."
_	But her husband prevailed on Kamsa with the promise that he would surrender to him all sons born to them.
_	In view of the growing number of pogroms — Jews were held responsible for the Black Plague in 1348 — the Emperor included a statement in the promise that turned out to be fatal.
_	In December, Tackett moved back to Madison on the promise that her father would buy her a car.
_	It is not the substance inside the can that helps them, but rather their faith in the promise that it will help them."
_	Katherine refuses to give it to them unless they get a witch to get her out of the tomb with the promise that she'll leave Mystic Falls and never come back.
_	He then marries his sweetheart with the promise that he will become a fisherman now that Pilon has found the money to buy a boat.
_	Eventually, Zoe is able to convince the lonely and attached Misty to let Kyle go with her under the promise that she'll return.
_	Johnson and Simmons remove James's wristwatch, but he betrays them to the Watchdogs with the promise that they would kill him once he helped destroy the other Inhumans—James hates himself and his Inhuman identity.
_	She agreed, but only on the promise that he would do it on her rather than on himself.
_	Keyes and Farris made a full confession with the promise that they'd be pardoned and safely escorted out of the state after the trial.
_	The true and global revitalisation of interest in the concept dates from 1903, when Pelham Warner took a team to Australia with the promise that he would regain "the ashes".
_	Leonard Nimoy had not intended to have a role in the sequel, but was enticed back on the promise that his character would be given a dramatic death scene.
_	York surrendered to the Norwegians under the promise that the victors would not force entry to their city, perhaps because Tostig would not want his capital looted.
_	Relocation from Newmarket, Ontario in 1994 was made on the promise that a new arena would be built in Sarnia.
_	Puccio contacted Kent and convinced him to come out with the group that night, with the promise that they would race their cars and that Willis wanted to have sex with him again.
_	Total Nonstop Action Wrestling used a "Pole match" as a setup to another match, placing objects at four of their six turnbuckles with the promise that the first wrestler to reach each object would be allowed to use them weeks later at an already scheduled cage match.
_	In the years of stalemate, Ixcanha agreed to nominal recognition of the government of Mexico in exchange for some guns to defend themselves from Cruzob raids and the promise that the Mexican government would otherwise leave them alone.
_	This included the promise that he would be treated as an ally and a friend, and not a PoW. Singh initially helped Fujiwara to take control of the situation of looting and arson that had developed in Alor Star.
_	Spike has the opportunity to kill her but the kid distracts him and he lets her go with the promise that they'll meet again.
_	The women were encouraged to keep campaigning, with the promise that an African-American candidate would be nominated by the party in a coming election.
_	In August 1927, he received from the Catholic Minister of Education Waszink the promise that the government would give a grant for a new secondary institution in Leiden.
_	Ickx was stood down after the 1975 French GP with the promise that Chapman might re-employ him when a competitive new Lotus was ready to race.
_	In the story, Smith comes to America in 1854 on the promise that there are "fritter trees" there.
_	After the creation of a multiparty system in Serbia, Milošević and his political allies in Serbia elsewhere in Yugoslavia pushed for the creation of a democratic multiparty system of government at the federal level, such as Serbian state media appealing to the citizens of Bosnia and Herzegovina in early 1992 with the promise that Bosnia and Herzegovina could peacefully coexist in a democratic Yugoslav federation alongside the republics of Serbia and Montenegro.
_	Death makes the promise that, once he has received the 12 souls, he will help them to escape.
_	Opening with the instantly forgettable title cut and closing with Then What, a watered-down attempt at Jimmy Buffett-inspired calypso, Rumor Has It finds Mr. Walker abandoning all the promise that spurred his 1993 debut album for empty-headed mainstream pap.
_	As they moved further south they came across the overflowing Tungabhadra river and was helped by a Kuruba called "Jaladhi Bapparaya" to cross the river on the promise that he would name the community after him.
_	He had campaigned on the promise that Staten Island's grievances would be addressed.
_	Mechanical sewing machines were introduced in 1851 with the promise that they would liberate women from household drudgery.
_	In January 1868, at the recommendation of Dr William Lockhart, Bushell was offered a position as physician to the British Legation in Beijing, China, with an annual salary of £600 and the promise that he could also engage in private practice at Beijing if he wished.
_	It was the first medical treatment for the Raiders who were dropped behind Japanese lines with the promise that they would be taken out in a couple of weeks.
_	Despite the promise that he had shown at Helsingborg, Nilsson spent most of his first two seasons with IFK on the bench.
